Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.51
Digital audiovisual works, defined.

Digital audiovisual works means a series of related images which, when shown in succession, impart an impression of motion, together with accompanying sounds, if any.

Laws 2008, LB916, § 11.